Maine, session 132, LD275.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police - Support 0981
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position, retroactive to February 28, 2024.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,984 $0 $0
All Other $132 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $11,116 $0 $0
Page 1 - 132LR2410(03)

Traffic Safety 0546
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one State Police Specialist
position to a State Police Specialist Corporal position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,019 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $13,019 $0 $0
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT
OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $24,135 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $24,135 $0 $0
FUNDS
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in technology costs in accordance with
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology
increases.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $121,808 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $121,808 $0 $0
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the increase in postage-related expenses.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $43,850 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $43,850 $0 $0
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 2 Senior Motor Vehicle
Section Manager positions to 2 Regional Motor Vehicle Service Manager positions and
provides funding for related All Other costs, retroactive to February 2024.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $16,664 $0 $0
All Other $721 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $17,385 $0 $0
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Page 2 - 132LR2410(03)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Secretary Specialist
position to a Public Service Coordinator I position and provides funding for related All
Other costs, retroactive to June 2024.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,504 $0 $0
All Other $628 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $15,132 $0 $0
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in contract expenses for issuing driver's license
and state identification credentials.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $147,194 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $147,194 $0 $0
SECRETARY OF STATE,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $345,369 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $345,369 $0 $0
FUNDS
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for Capital Expenditures in the Multimodal
Transportation Fund, Highway Fund and offsets that increase with a one-time reduction in
funding for Personal Services in the Maintenance and Operations, Highway Fund based on
anticipated vacancies.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($15,000,000) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL ($15,000,000) $0 $0
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($138,121) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
Page 3 - 132LR2410(03)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($138,121) $0 $0
TOTAL
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for Capital Expenditures in the Multimodal
Transportation Fund, Highway Fund and offsets that increase with a one-time reduction in
funding for Personal Services in the Maintenance and Operations, Highway Fund based on
anticipated vacancies.
HIGHWAY FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $15,000,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $15,000,000 $0 $0
TRANSPORTATION,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $0 $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($138,121) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL ($138,121) $0 $0
FUNDS
SECTION TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $369,504 $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($138,121) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $231,383 $0 $0
PART B
Sec. B-1. Carrying provision; Department of Secretary of State,
Administration - Motor Vehicles program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the State Controller shall carry forward up to $9,000,000 in the All Other line
category in the Department of Secretary of State, Administration - Motor Vehicles
program, after all financial commitments for obligations and budgetary adjustments have
been made, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25 to the next fiscal year to the All Other line
category in the Department of Secretary of State, Administration - Motor Vehicles
program, of which up to $2,000,000 must be used for the Bureau of Motor Vehicles
modernization project and up to $7,000,000 must be used for the new license plate general
issue project. These funds were previously authorized to be carried forward in Public Law
2023, chapter 50, Part B.
PART C
Page 4 - 132LR2410(03)

Sec. C-1. Carrying provision; Department of Secretary of State,
Administration - Motor Vehicles program. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, the State Controller shall carry forward up to $2,500,000 in unexpended
balances in the Personal Services and All Other line categories in the Department of
Secretary of State, Administration - Motor Vehicles program, after all financial
commitments for obligations and budgetary adjustments have been made, at the end of
fiscal year 2024-25 to the All Other line category in the Department of Secretary of State,
Administration - Motor Vehicles program. These funds must be used to continue the
modernization of systems and services at the Bureau of Motor Vehicles.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 5 - 132LR2410(03)